Hawaii statutes.
B. Scholarship and Assistance Programs

[§304A-501] University of Hawaii
scholarship and assistance program; power of regents to grant scholarship and
assistance. The board of regents, or its designated representatives, is
authorized to grant, modify, or suspend scholarship and assistance. The board
may exercise this authority through the University of Hawaii scholarship and
assistance special fund established under section [304A-2159]. [L 2006, c 75,
pt of §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

Making State Merit Scholarship Programs More Equitable and
Less Vulnerable. 37 UH L. Rev. 155 (2015).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next